Washington statutes.
RCW 19.166.060

Rules—Fee.

The secretary of state may adopt rules as necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter. The rules may include providing for a reasonable registration fee, not to exceed fifty dollars, to defray the costs of processing registrations.

[ 1991 c 128 s 6.]